Georgia, session 2025_26, HB283.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 40-13-2.1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to signature on
citations required, effect of failure to sign, exemption for out-of-state drivers, and electronic
capture of signature, is amended by revising subsection (a) as follows:
"(a) A person who is issued a citation as provided in this chapter or Code Section 17-6-11,
relating to display of driver's license in lieu of bail, shall may sign the citation to
acknowledge receipt of the citation and of his or her obligation to appear for trial. The
officer shall advise the person that signing the citation is not an admission of guilt and that
failure to sign will result in the person having to post a cash bond appear for trial. If the
person refuses to sign the citation, it shall constitute reasonable cause to believe that the
H. B. 283
- 1 -

LC 48 1375
person will not appear at trial and the officer shall write 'Refusal to Sign' on such citation
and shall give the citation to such person. The officer may bring the person before a
judicial officer or traffic violations bureau to post a bond as is otherwise provided by law."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 283
- 2 -